Hawaii statutes.
§621-4 Compelling attendance. Upon
nonattendance of witnesses duly summoned, the service of the writ being proved,
the court shall have summary power to cause their attendance and to punish them
for contempt. [L 1876, c 32, §3; RL 1925, §2565; RL 1935, §3813; RL 1945,
§9824; RL 1955, §222-4; HRS §621-4; am L 1972, c 104, §1(b)]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 45(f); DCRCP rule 45(f).

Case Notes

Compelling attendance by attachment. 10 H. 379, 383 (1896).

Where defendant acted diligently to procure material
witnesses and they fail to appear, case should be continued. 56 H. 452, 540
P.2d 63 (1975).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next